Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-399
Assault of an unborn child in the third degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of assault of an unborn child in the third degree if he or she, during the commission of any criminal assault on a pregnant woman, recklessly causes serious bodily injury to her unborn child.

(2) Assault of an unborn child in the third degree is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 6.